California statutes. Corporations Code
 partnership becomes registered as a foreign limited liability partnership at the time of the filing of the initial registration with the Secretary of State or at any later date or time specified in the registration and the payment of the fee required by subdivision (b). A partnership continues to be registered as a foreign limited liability partnership until a notice that it is no longer so registered as a foreign limited liability partnership has been filed pursuant to Section 16960 or, if applicable, once it has been dissolved and finally wound up. The status of a partnership registered as a foreign limited liability partnership and the liability of a partner of that foreign limited liability partnership shall not be adversely affected by errors or subsequent changes in the information stated in an application for registration under subdivision (a) or an amended registration or notice under Section 16960.

(f) The fact that a registration or amended registration pursuant to Section 16960 is on file with the Secretary of State is notice that the partnership is a foreign limited liability partnership and of those other facts contained therein that are required to be set forth in the registration or amended registration.

(g) The Secretary of State shall provide a form for a registration under subdivision (a), which shall include the form for confirming compliance with the optional security requirement pursuant to subdivision (c) of Section 16956. The Secretary of State shall include with instructional materials, provided in conjunction with the form for registration under subdivision (a), a notice that filing the registration will obligate the limited liability partnership to pay an
 annual tax for that taxable year to the Franchise Tax Board pursuant to Section 17948 of the Revenue and Taxation Code. That notice shall be updated annually to specify the dollar amount of this tax.

(h) A foreign limited liability partnership transacting intrastate business in this state shall not maintain any action, suit, or proceeding in any court of this state until it has registered in this state pursuant to this section.

(i) Any foreign limited liability partnership that transacts intrastate business in this state without registration is subject to a penalty of twenty dollars ($20) for each day that unauthorized intrastate business is transacted, up to a maximum of ten thousand dollars ($10,000).

(j) A
 partner of a foreign limited liability partnership is not liable for the debts or obligations of the foreign limited liability partnership solely by reason of its having transacted business in this state without registration.

(k) A foreign limited liability partnership, transacting business in this state without registration, appoints the Secretary of State as its agent for service of process with respect to causes of action arising out of the transaction of business in this state.

(l) “Transact intrastate business” as used in this section means to repeatedly and successively provide professional limited liability partnership services in this state, other than in interstate or foreign commerce.

(m) Without excluding other
 activities that may not be considered to be transacting intrastate business, a foreign limited liability partnership shall not be considered to be transacting intrastate business merely because its subsidiary or affiliate transacts intrastate business, or merely because of its status as any one or more of the following:

(1) A shareholder of a domestic corporation.

(2) A shareholder of a foreign corporation transacting intrastate business.

(3) A limited partner of a foreign limited partnership transacting intrastate business.

(4) A limited partner of a domestic limited partnership.

(5) A member
 or manager of a foreign limited liability company transacting intrastate business.

(6) A member or manager of a domestic limited liability company.

(n) Without excluding other activities that may not be considered to be transacting intrastate business, a foreign limited liability partnership shall not be considered to be transacting intrastate business within the meaning of this subdivision solely by reason of carrying on in this state any one or more of the following activities:

(1) Maintaining or defending any action or suit or any administrative or arbitration proceeding, or effecting the settlement thereof or the settlement of claims or disputes.

(2) Holding meetings of its partners or carrying on any other activities concerning its internal affairs.

(3) Maintaining bank accounts.

(4) Maintaining offices or agencies for the transfer, exchange, and registration of the foreign limited liability partnership’s securities or maintaining trustees or depositories with respect to those securities.

(5) Effecting sales through independent contractors.

(6) Soliciting or procuring orders, whether by mail or through employees or agents or otherwise, where those orders require acceptance without this state before becoming binding contracts.

(7) Creating
 or acquiring evidences of debt or mortgages, liens, or security interest in real or personal property.

(8) Securing or collecting debts or enforcing mortgages and security interests in property securing the debts.

(9) Conducting an isolated transaction that is completed within 180 days and not in the course of a number of repeated transactions of a like nature.

(o) A person shall not be deemed to be transacting intrastate business in this state merely because of its status as a partner of a registered limited liability partnership or a foreign limited liability company whether or not registered to transact intrastate business in this state.

(p) The Attorney
 General may bring an action to restrain a foreign limited liability partnership from transacting intrastate business in this state in violation of this chapter.

(q) Nothing in this section is intended to, or shall, augment, diminish, or otherwise alter existing provisions of law, statutes, or court rules relating to services by a California architect, California public accountant, California engineer, California land surveyor, or California attorney in another jurisdiction, or services by an out-of-state architect, out-of-state public accountant, out-of-state engineer, out-of-state land surveyor, or out-of-state attorney in California.

(r) An agent designated for service of process may deliver to the Secretary of State, on a form prescribed by the Secretary of State for filing,
 a signed and acknowledged written statement of resignation as an agent for service of process containing the name of the foreign limited liability partnership and Secretary of State’s file number of the foreign limited liability partnership, the name of the resigning agent for service of process, and a statement that the agent is resigning. On filing of the statement of resignation, the authority of the agent to act in that capacity shall cease and the Secretary of State shall mail or otherwise provide written notice of the filing of the statement of resignation to the foreign limited liability partnership at its principal office.

(s) The resignation of an agent may be effective if, on a form prescribed by the Secretary of State containing the name of the foreign limited liability partnership and Secretary of State’s file number for the
 foreign limited liability partnership and the name of the agent for service of process, the agent disclaims having been properly appointed as the agent.

(t) If an individual who has been designated agent for service of process dies or resigns or no longer resides in the state, or if the corporate agent for that purpose resigns, dissolves, withdraws from the state, forfeits its right to transact intrastate business, has its corporate rights, powers, and privileges suspended, or ceases to exist, the foreign limited liability partnership shall promptly file an amended application for registration as a foreign limited liability partnership designating a new agent.

(u) The Secretary of State may destroy or otherwise dispose of any resignation filed pursuant to this section after a new
 application for registration as a foreign limited liability partnership is filed pursuant to this section replacing the agent for service of process that has resigned.

(v) This section shall remain in effect only until January 1, 2034, and as of that date is repealed.

(History: Amended (as amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 617, Sec. 113) by Stats. 2024, Ch. 361, Sec. 14.   (AB 1862)   Effective January 1, 2025.   Repealed as of January 1, 2034, by its own provisions.    See later operative version, as amended by Sec.15 Stats. 2024, Ch. 361.)
-------------------------------------------

16959.

(a) (1) Before transacting intrastate business in this state, a foreign limited liability partnership shall comply with all statutory and administrative registration or filing requirements of the state board, commission, or agency that prescribes the rules and regulations governing a particular profession in which the partnership proposes to be engaged, pursuant to the applicable provisions of the Business and Professions Code relating to the profession or applicable rules adopted by the governing board. A foreign limited liability partnership that transacts intrastate business in this state shall within 30 days after the effective date of the act enacting this section or the date on which the foreign limited liability
 partnership first transacts intrastate business in this state, whichever is later, register with the Secretary of State by submitting to the Secretary of State an application for registration as a foreign limited liability partnership, signed by a person with authority to do so under the laws of the jurisdiction of formation of the foreign limited liability partnership, stating the name of the partnership, the street address of its principal office, the mailing address of the principal office if different from the street address, the name and street address of its agent for service of process in this state in accordance with subdivision (a) of Section 16309, a brief statement of the business in which the partnership engages, and any other matters that the partnership determines to include.

(2) Annexed to the application for registration shall be a certificate
 from an authorized public official of the foreign limited liability partnership’s jurisdiction of organization to the effect that the foreign limited liability partnership is in good standing in that jurisdiction, if the laws of that jurisdiction permit the issuance of those certificates, or, in the alternative, a statement by the foreign limited liability partnership that the laws of its jurisdiction of organization do not permit the issuance of those certificates.

(b) The registration shall be accompanied by a fee as set forth in subdivision (b) of Section 12189 of the Government Code.

(c) If the Secretary of State finds that an application for registration conforms to law and all requisite fees have been paid, the Secretary of State shall issue a certificate of registration to transact
 intrastate business in this state.

(d) The Secretary of State may cancel the filing of the registration if a check or other remittance accepted in payment of the filing fee is not paid upon presentation. Within 90 days of receiving written notification that the item presented for payment has not been honored for payment, the Secretary of State shall give a first written notice of the applicability of this section to the agent for service of process or to the person submitting the instrument. Thereafter, if the amount has not been paid by cashier’s check or equivalent, the Secretary of State shall give a second written notice of cancellation and the cancellation shall thereupon be effective. The second notice shall be given 20 days or more after the first notice.

(e) A
 partnership becomes registered as a foreign limited liability partnership at the time of the filing of the initial registration with the Secretary of State or at any later date or time specified in the registration and the payment of the fee required by subdivision (b). A partnership continues to be registered as a foreign limited liability partnership until a notice that it is no longer so registered as a foreign limited liability partnership has been filed pursuant to Section 16960 or, if applicable, once it has been dissolved and finally wound up. The status of a partnership registered as a foreign limited liability partnership and the liability of a partner of that foreign limited liability partnership shall not be adversely affected by errors or subsequent changes in the information stated in an application for registration under subdivision (a) or an amended registration or notice under Section 16960.

(f) The fact that a registration or amended registration pursuant to Section 16960 is on file with the Secretary of State is notice that the partnership is a foreign limited liability partnership and of those other facts contained therein that are required to be set forth in the registration or amended registration.

(g) The Secretary of State shall provide a form for a registration under subdivision (a), which shall include the form for confirming compliance with the optional security requirement pursuant to subdivision (c) of Section 16956. The Secretary of State shall include with instructional materials, provided in conjunction with the form for registration under subdivision (a), a notice that filing the registration will obligate the limited liability partnership to pay an
 annual tax for that taxable year to the Franchise Tax Board pursuant to Section 17948 of the Revenue and Taxation Code. That notice shall be updated annually to specify the dollar amount of this tax.

(h) A foreign limited liability partnership transacting intrastate business in this state shall not maintain any action, suit, or proceeding in any court of this state until it has registered in this state pursuant to this section.

(i) Any foreign limited liability partnership that transacts intrastate business in this state without registration is subject to a penalty of twenty dollars ($20) for each day that unauthorized intrastate business is transacted, up to a maximum of ten thousand dollars ($10,000).

(j) A
 partner of a foreign limited liability partnership is not liable for the debts or obligations of the foreign limited liability partnership solely by reason of its having transacted business in this state without registration.

(k) A foreign limited liability partnership, transacting business in this state without registration, appoints the Secretary of State as its agent for service of process with respect to causes of action arising out of the transaction of business in this state.

(l) “Transact intrastate business” as used in this section means to repeatedly and successively provide professional limited liability partnership services in this state, other than in interstate or foreign commerce.

(m) Without excluding other
 activities that may not be considered to be transacting intrastate business, a foreign limited liability partnership shall not be considered to be transacting intrastate business merely because its subsidiary or affiliate transacts intrastate business, or merely because of its status as any one or more of the following:

(1) A shareholder of a domestic corporation.

(2) A shareholder of a foreign corporation transacting intrastate business.

(3) A limited partner of a foreign limited partnership transacting intrastate business.

(4) A limited partner of a domestic limited partnership.

(5) A member
 or manager of a foreign limited liability company transacting intrastate business.

(6) A member or manager of a domestic limited liability company.

(n) Without excluding other activities that may not be considered to be transacting intrastate business, a foreign limited liability partnership shall not be considered to be transacting intrastate business within the meaning of this subdivision solely by reason of carrying on in this state any one or more of the following activities:

(1) Maintaining or defending any action or suit or any administrative or arbitration proceeding, or effecting the settlement thereof or the settlement of claims or disputes.

(2) Holding meetings of its partners or carrying on any other activities concerning its internal affairs.

(3) Maintaining bank accounts.

(4) Maintaining offices or agencies for the transfer, exchange, and registration of the foreign limited liability partnership’s securities or maintaining trustees or depositories with respect to those securities.

(5) Effecting sales through independent contractors.

(6) Soliciting or procuring orders, whether by mail or through employees or agents or otherwise, where those orders require acceptance without this state before becoming binding contracts.

(7) Creating
 or acquiring evidences of debt or mortgages, liens, or security interest in real or personal property.

(8) Securing or collecting debts or enforcing mortgages and security interests in property securing the debts.

(9) Conducting an isolated transaction that is completed within 180 days and not in the course of a number of repeated transactions of a like nature.

(o) A person shall not be deemed to be transacting intrastate business in this state merely because of its status as a partner of a registered limited liability partnership or a foreign limited liability company whether or not registered to transact intrastate business in this state.

(p) The Attorney
 General may bring an action to restrain a foreign limited liability partnership from transacting intrastate business in this state in violation of this chapter.

(q) Nothing in this section is intended to, or shall, augment, diminish, or otherwise alter existing provisions of law, statutes, or court rules relating to services by a California public accountant or California attorney in another jurisdiction, or services by an out-of-state public accountant or out-of-state attorney in California.

(r) An agent designated for service of process may deliver to the Secretary of State, on a form prescribed by the Secretary of State for filing, a signed and acknowledged written statement of resignation as an agent for service of process containing the name of the foreign limited liability
 partnership and Secretary of State’s file number of the foreign limited liability partnership, the name of the resigning agent for service of process, and a statement that
 the agent is resigning. On filing of the statement of resignation, the authority of the agent to act in that capacity shall cease and the Secretary of State shall mail or otherwise provide written notice of the filing of the statement of resignation to the foreign limited liability partnership at its principal office.

(s) The resignation of an agent may be effective if, on a form prescribed by the Secretary of State containing the name and Secretary of State’s file number for the foreign limited liability partnership and the name of the agent for service of process, the agent disclaims having been properly appointed as the agent.

(t) If an individual who has been designated agent for service of process dies or resigns or no longer resides in the state, or if the corporate
 agent for that purpose resigns, dissolves, withdraws from the state, forfeits its right to transact intrastate business, has its corporate rights, powers, and privileges suspended, or ceases to exist, the foreign limited liability partnership shall promptly file an amended application for registration as a foreign limited liability partnership designating a new agent.

(u) The Secretary of State may destroy or otherwise dispose of any resignation filed pursuant to this section after a new application for registration as a foreign limited liability partnership is filed pursuant to this section replacing the agent for service of process that has resigned.

(v) This section shall become operative on January 1, 2034.

(History: Amended (as amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 617, Sec. 114) by Stats. 2024, Ch. 361, Sec. 15.   (AB 1862)   Effective January 1, 2025.   Section operative January 1, 2034, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

16960.

(a) The registration of a foreign limited liability partnership may be amended by an amended registration executed by one or more partners authorized to execute an amended registration and filed with the Secretary of State, as soon as reasonably practical after any information set forth in the registration or previously filed amended registration becomes inaccurate, to add information to the registration or amended registration or to withdraw its registration as a foreign limited liability partnership.

(b) If a foreign limited liability partnership ceases to be a limited liability partnership, it shall file with the Secretary of State a notice, executed by one or more
 partners authorized to execute the notice, that it is no longer a foreign limited liability partnership. The notice shall state that a final annual tax return, as described by Section 17948.3 of the Revenue and Taxation Code, has been or will be filed with the Franchise Tax Board, as required under Part 10.2 (commencing with Section 18401) of the Revenue and Taxation Code.

(c) A foreign limited liability partnership that is, but is no longer required to be, registered under Section 16959 may withdraw its registration by filing a notice with the Secretary of State, executed by one or more partners authorized to execute the notice.

(d) The Secretary of State shall provide forms for an amended registration under subdivision (a) and notices under subdivisions (b) and (c).

(e) If a foreign limited liability partnership files an amendment changing the name of the foreign limited liability partnership in its jurisdiction of organization, annexed to the application for registration shall be a certificate from an authorized public official of the foreign limited liability partnership’s jurisdiction of organization certifying that the foreign limited liability partnership is in good standing and that the change of name was made in accordance with the laws of that jurisdiction, if the laws of that jurisdiction permit the issuance of those certificates, or, in the alternative, a statement by the foreign limited liability partnership that the laws of its jurisdiction of organization do not permit the issuance of those certificates. Unless the Secretary of State determines that the amendment to the application changing the
 name or alternate name of a foreign limited liability partnership does not comply with the filing requirements of this chapter, the Secretary of State, upon payment of all requisite fees, shall file the amended application and shall issue to the foreign limited liability partnership a new certificate of registration stating the date of filing of the amendment to the application changing the name and that the foreign limited liability partnership is qualified to transact intrastate business, subject to any licensing requirements otherwise imposed by the laws of this state.

(f) The filing of amended registration forms pursuant to subdivision (a) and a notice pursuant to subdivision (b) or (c) shall each be accompanied by a fee as set forth in subdivision (d) of Section 12189 of the Government Code.

(g) A notice of cessation, signed pursuant to subdivision (b), shall be filed with the Secretary of State. The Secretary of State shall notify the Franchise Tax Board of the cessation.

(h) A certificate of merger or the agreement of merger shall have the effect of the filing of a notice of termination for each disappearing foreign limited liability partnership.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 617, Sec. 115.   (SB 1202)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

16961.

The filing of a registration with the Secretary of State under Section 16953 or 16959 shall make it unnecessary for all purposes for the registered limited liability partnership or foreign limited liability partnership to make any of the filings referred to in Chapter 5 (commencing with Section 17900) of Part 3 of Division 7 of the Business and Professions Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 1003, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------

16962.

(a) Each registered limited liability partnership whose principal office is not in this state and each foreign limited liability partnership registered under Section 16959 shall designate as its agent for service of process any natural person or a domestic or foreign corporation entitled to be designated as agent for the service of process pursuant to Section 1505.

(b) In addition to service that may be made as provided in Section 416.40 of the Code of Civil Procedure, delivery by hand of a copy of any process against a registered limited liability partnership or foreign limited liability partnership registered under Section 16959 (1) to any natural
 person designated by it as agent or (2), if a corporate agent has been designated, to any person named in the latest certificate of the corporate agent filed pursuant to Section 1505 at the office of that corporate agent shall constitute valid service on the registered limited liability partnership or foreign limited liability partnership.

(c) If an agent for the purpose of service of process has resigned and has not been replaced or if the agent designated cannot with reasonable diligence be found at the address designated for personally delivering the process, or if no agent has been designated, and it is shown by affidavit to the satisfaction of the court that process against a registered limited liability partnership or foreign limited liability partnership required to be registered under Section 16959 cannot be served with reasonable
 diligence upon the designated agent by hand in the manner provided in Section 415.10, subdivision (a) of Section 415.20, or subdivision (a) of Section 415.30 of the Code of Civil Procedure or upon the registered limited liability partnership or foreign limited liability partnership in the manner provided in Section 416.40 of the Code of Civil Procedure, the court may make an order that the service be made upon the registered limited liability partnership or foreign limited liability partnership by delivering by hand to the Secretary of State, or to any person employed in the Secretary of State’s office in the capacity of assistant or deputy, one copy of the process for each defendant to be served, together with a copy of the order authorizing that service. If the court makes that order, the Secretary of State who receives the process, or the person employed in the Secretary of State’s office in
 the capacity of assistant or deputy who receives the process, is required to accept the process. A fee as set forth in subdivision (b) of Section 12197 of the Government Code shall be paid to the Secretary of State for the use of the state upon receipt of the process. Service in this manner shall be deemed complete on the 10th day after delivery of the process to the Secretary of State.

(d) Upon the receipt of the copy of process and the fee therefor, the Secretary of State shall give notice of the service of process to the registered limited liability partnership or foreign limited liability partnership registered under Section 16959 at its principal office, by forwarding to that office, by registered mail with request for return receipt, the copy of the process or, if the records of the Secretary of State do not disclose an address for that
 principal office, by forwarding the copy in the same manner to the last designated agent for service of process who has not resigned. If the agent for service of process has resigned and has not been replaced and the records of the Secretary of State do not disclose an address for its principal office, no action need be taken by the Secretary of State.

(e) The Secretary of State shall keep a record of all process served upon the Secretary of State under this section and shall record therein the time of service and the Secretary of State’s action with reference thereto. The certificate of the Secretary of State, under the Secretary of State’s official seal, certifying to the receipt of process, the giving of notice thereof to the registered limited liability partnership or foreign limited liability partnership, and the forwarding of
 the process pursuant to this section shall be competent and prima facie evidence of the matters stated therein.

(f) The court order pursuant to subdivision (c) that service of process be made upon the registered limited liability partnership or foreign limited liability partnership by delivery to the Secretary of State may be a court order of a court of another state, or of any federal court, if the suit, action, or proceeding has been filed in that court.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 617, Sec. 116.   (SB 1202)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------



======================================================================

TITLE 2.6. CALIFORNIA REVISED UNIFORM LIMITED LIABILITY COMPANY ACT  [17701.01. - 17713.13.]



ARTICLE 1. General Provisions [17701.01. - 17701.17.]

17701.01.

This title may be cited as the California Revised Uniform Limited Liability Company Act.

(History: Added by Stats. 2012, Ch. 419, Sec. 20.   (SB 323)   Effective January 1, 2013.   Operative January 1, 2014, by Sec. 32 of Ch. 419.)
-------------------------------------------

17701.02.

In this title:

(a) “Acknowledged” means that an instrument is either of the following:

(1) Formally acknowledged as provided in Article 3 (commencing with Section 1180) of Chapter 4 of Title 4 of Part 4 of Division 2 of the Civil Code.

(2) Executed to include substantially the following wording preceding the signature:
“It is hereby declared that I am the person who executed this instrument which execution is my act and deed.”
Any certificate of acknowledgment taken without this state
 before a notary public or a judge or clerk of a court of record having an official seal need not be further authenticated.

(b) “Articles of organization” means the articles required by Section 17702.01. The term includes the articles of organization as amended or restated.

(c) “Contribution” means any benefit provided by a person to a limited liability company:

(1) In order to become a member upon formation of the limited liability company and in accordance with an agreement between or among the persons that have agreed to become the initial members of the limited liability company.

(2) In order to become a member after formation of the limited liability
 company and in accordance with an agreement between the person and the limited liability company.

(3) In the person’s capacity as a member and in accordance with the operating agreement or an agreement between the member and the limited liability company.

(d) “Debtor in bankruptcy” means a person that is the subject of either of the following:

(1) An order for relief under Title 11 of the United States Code or a successor statute of general application.

(2) A comparable order under federal, state, or foreign law governing bankruptcy or insolvency, an assignment for the benefit of creditors, or an order appointing a trustee, receiver, or liquidator of
 the person or of all or substantially all of the person’s property.

(e) “Designated office” means either of the following:

(1) The office that a limited liability company is required to designate and maintain under Section 17701.13.

(2) The principal office of a foreign limited liability company.

(f) “Distribution,” except as otherwise provided in subdivision (g) of Section 17704.05, means a transfer of money or other property from a limited liability company to another person on account of a transferable interest.

(g) “Domestic” means organized under the laws of this state when used in relation to any limited
 liability company, other business entity, or person other than a natural person.

(h) “Effective,” with respect to a record required or permitted to be delivered to the Secretary of State for filing under this title, means effective under subdivision (c) of Section 17702.05.

(i) (1) “Electronic transmission by the limited liability company” means a communication delivered by any of the following means:

(A) Facsimile telecommunication or electronic mail when directed to the facsimile number or electronic mail address, respectively, for that recipient on record with the limited liability company.

(B) Posting on an electronic message board
 or network that the limited liability company has designated for those communications, together with a separate notice to the recipient of the posting, which transmission shall be validly delivered upon the later of the posting or delivery of the separate notice thereof.

(C) Other means of electronic communication to which both of the following apply:

(i) The communication is delivered to a recipient who has provided an unrevoked consent to the use of those means of transmission.

(ii) The communication creates a record that is capable of retention, retrieval, and review, and that may thereafter be rendered into clearly legible tangible form.

(2) “Electronic transmission to the limited liability company” means a communication delivered by any of the following means:

(A) Facsimile telecommunication or electronic mail when directed to the facsimile number or electronic mail address, respectively, that the limited liability company has provided from time to time to members or managers for sending communications to the limited liability company.

(B) Posting on an electronic message board or network that the limited liability company has designated for those communications, which transmission shall be validly delivered upon the posting.

(C) Other means of electronic communication to which both of the following apply:

(i) The limited liability company has placed in effect reasonable measures to verify that the sender is the member or manager, in person or by proxy, purporting to send the transmission.

(ii) The communication creates a record that is capable of retention, retrieval, and review, and that may thereafter be rendered into clearly legible tangible form.

(j) “Foreign limited liability company” means an unincorporated entity formed under the law of a jurisdiction other than this state and denominated by that law as a limited liability company.

(k) “Limited liability company,” except in the phrase “foreign limited liability company,” means a domestic entity formed under this title or an entity that becomes subject to this
 title pursuant to Article 13 (commencing with Section 17713.01).

(l) “Majority of the managers” unless otherwise provided in the operating agreement, means more than 50 percent of the managers of the limited liability company.

(m) “Majority of the members” unless otherwise provided in the operating agreement, means more than 50 percent of the membership interests of members in current profits of the limited liability company.

(n) “Manager” means a person that under the operating agreement of a manager-managed limited liability company is responsible, alone or in concert with others, for performing the management functions stated in subdivision (c) of Section 17704.07.

(o) “Manager-managed limited liability company” means a limited liability company that qualifies under subdivision (a) of Section 17704.07.

(p) “Member” means a person that has become a member of a limited liability company under Section 17704.01 and has not dissociated under Section 17706.02.

(q) “Member-managed limited liability company” means a limited liability company that is not a manager-managed limited liability company.

(r) “Membership interest” means a member’s rights in the limited liability company, including the member’s transferable interest, any right to vote or participate in management, and any right to information concerning the business and affairs of the limited liability company
 provided by this title.

(s) “Operating agreement” means the agreement, whether or not referred to as an operating agreement and whether oral, in a record, implied, or in any combination thereof, of all the members of a limited liability company, including a sole member, concerning the matters described in subdivision (a) of Section 17701.10. The term “operating agreement” may include, without more, an agreement of all members to organize a limited liability company pursuant to this title. An operating agreement of a limited liability company having only one member shall not be unenforceable by reason of there being only one person who is a party to the operating agreement. The term includes the agreement as amended or restated.

(t) “Organization” means, whether domestic or
 foreign, a partnership whether general or limited, limited liability company, association, corporation, professional corporation, professional association, nonprofit corporation, business trust, or statutory business trust having a governing statute.

(u) “Organizer” means a person that acts under Section 17702.01 to form a limited liability company.

(v) “Person” means an individual, partnership, limited partnership, trust, a trustee of a trust, including, but not limited to, a trust described under Division 9 (commencing with Section 15000) of the Probate Code, estate, association, corporation, limited liability company, or other entity, whether domestic or foreign. Nothing in this subdivision shall be construed to confer any rights under the California Constitution or the
 United States Constitution.

(w) “Principal office” means the principal office of a limited liability company or foreign limited liability company, whether or not the office is located in this state.

(x) “Record” means information that is inscribed on a tangible medium or that is stored in an electronic or other medium and is retrievable in perceivable form.

(y) “State” means a state of the United States, the District of Columbia, Puerto Rico, the United States Virgin Islands, or any territory or insular possession subject to the jurisdiction of the United States.

(z) “Transfer” includes an assignment, conveyance, deed, bill of sale, lease, mortgage,
 security interest, encumbrance, gift, and
 transfer by operation of law.

(aa) “Transferable interest” means the right, as originally associated with a person’s capacity as a member, to receive distributions from a limited liability company in accordance with the operating agreement, whether or not the person remains a member or continues to own any part of the right.

(ab) “Transferee” means a person to which all or part of a transferable interest has been transferred, whether or not the transferor is a member.

(ac) “Vote” includes authorization by written consent or consent given by electronic transmission to the limited liability company.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 617, Sec. 117.   (SB 1202)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

17701.04.

(a) A limited liability company is an entity distinct from its members.
